California statutes. Financial Code
(a) Except as set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c), any loan or obligation made or acquired by an industrial loan company that has investment certificates outstanding that is secured primarily by real property and has an outstanding principal balance of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more shall be secured by real property having a fair market value, or real property and personal property combined having a fair market value, at the time the loan or other obligation is made or acquired, of at least 110 percent of the principal amount
 owing on the loan or obligation and on prior encumbrances, except nondelinquent tax liens, secured by the same real property with regard to loans secured solely by real property, or by both real property and personal property. Fair market value of the real property for purposes of this section shall be determined by a real property appraiser who meets the qualifications established pursuant to Title XI of the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, Public Law 101-73, and any applicable regulations, guidelines, or policies thereunder.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to:

(1) Any loan guaranteed in whole or in part by the Administrator of Veterans Affairs pursuant to the Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944 or any act of Congress supplementary or amendatory thereof.

(2) Any loan insured
 by the Federal Housing Administration pursuant to the National Housing Act or any act of Congress supplementary or amendatory thereof.

(c) Subject to all other provisions of subdivision (a) and any requirements the commissioner may impose by rule or order, the following loans may be secured by real property having a fair market value of less than 110 percent of the principal amount of the loan and prior encumbrances:

(1) Any loan made by an industrial loan company to facilitate the sale of real property owned by the industrial loan company resulting from foreclosure or receipt of a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(2) Any loan renewed or modified by an industrial loan company pursuant to a clearly defined and well-documented program adopted by the board of directors of the industrial loan company to achieve orderly
 repayment of the loan or to maximize recovery of the loan.

(3) Any loan or obligation saleable in the secondary market. For purposes of this paragraph, “saleable in the secondary market” means saleable to a qualified institutional buyer, as evidenced by irrevocable commitments to buy by those qualified institutional buyers.

(4) Any loan or obligation owned for less than 90 days.

(d) In complying with the requirement of subdivision (a), an industrial loan company may include the principal amount of private mortgage insurance.

(e) Any loan or obligation made or acquired by an industrial loan company that has investment certificates outstanding that is secured solely by motor vehicles or other personal property shall be secured by that property having a
 fair market value at the time the loan or other obligation is made or acquired of at least 100 percent of the principal amount owing on the loan or obligation. The personal property held as security shall be of a class or kind that has been declared eligible by regulation of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 227, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18266.1.

An industrial loan company may make loans and acquire obligations, the proceeds of which are used for home improvements that are secured by real property having a market value of at least 100 percent of the principal amount owing on the loan being made by the industrial loan company or obligation being acquired by the industrial loan company and on prior encumbrances, except nondelinquent tax liens, secured by the same real property. Home improvements means additions, alterations, or modifications to owner-occupied property consisting of one to four dwelling
 units and appurtenant buildings thereto or to the real property containing same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18266.2.

An industrial loan company shall file a written request for authorization to conduct business under Section 18266.1. The request shall include the following information:

(a) A description of the company’s proposed plan of business.

(b) The character, business qualifications, and other experience of the proposed officers and managers directing the line of business for which authorization is requested.

(c) Any other facts and circumstances bearing on the proposal
 that, in the opinion of the commissioner, may be relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 889, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18266.3.

The commissioner shall approve the request made pursuant to Section 18266.2 within 30 days after filing unless the commissioner has ascertained that the company has failed to show either of the following:

(a) That the proposed plan of business has a reasonable promise of a successful operation.

(b) That the company has a person with the necessary business qualifications, experience or ability to direct and manage the operations of the plan of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 889, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18268.

An industrial loan company that has investment certificates outstanding shall not lend in the aggregate more than 5 percent of its capital stock and surplus not available for dividends as provided in Section 18319 upon the security of the stock of any one corporation and that stock may not exceed 10 percent of the outstanding stock of the corporation, or upon the security of the bonds of any one obligor except bonds of the United States or for the payment of which the credit of the United States is pledged, bonds of the State of California, or for the payment of which the credit of the State of California is pledged, and any security authorized in
 writing by the commissioner or any security authorized by rule of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 6.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18269.

An industrial loan company that has investment certificates outstanding shall not make any loan secured primarily by improved real property in a principal amount in excess of 20 percent of the company’s unimpaired capital stock and surplus not available for dividends as provided in Section 18319. An industrial loan company that has investment certificates outstanding shall not make any loan secured primarily by unimproved real property in a principal amount in excess of 10 percent of the company’s unimpaired capital stock and surplus not available for dividends as provided in Section 18319.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 7.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18270.

An industrial loan company may require the borrower to sign a contract of pledge, assignment, mortgage, security agreement, deed of trust, or trust receipt relating to real or personal property given by the borrower as security for the repayment of the loan and interest and charges thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18271.

An industrial loan company that has investment certificates outstanding shall not make loans to, or hold the obligations of, any one person as primary obligor in an aggregate principal amount in excess of 20 percent of the unimpaired capital stock and surplus of the company not available for dividends as provided in Section 18319. Unsecured loans or obligations of any person as primary obligor made or held by a company may not, in any event, exceed in the aggregate principal amount 5 percent of the unimpaired capital stock and surplus of the company not available for dividends as provided in Section 18319.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 8.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18272.

An industrial loan company shall diversify the loans and lease obligations it makes and other obligations it acquires, both as to the types of debtors and obligors, types of collateral, and as to terms and types of repayment schedules. The requirement for diversification notwithstanding, an industrial loan company may specialize in its lending, leasing, and other authorized practices under this division. The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 873, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

18274.

The principal balances of loans made, or obligations purchased, by an industrial loan company that has investment certificates outstanding, which loans or obligations are secured by unimproved real property, shall not in the aggregate exceed 5 percent of the company’s assets unless the commissioner consents to the taking of collateral to protect an existing jeopardized obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 296, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Insurance Sold With Loans [18290. - 18296.]

18290.

(a) As used in this division:

(1) “Credit life insurance” and “credit disability insurance” have the same meanings as defined in Section 779.2 of the Insurance Code.

(2) “Credit loss-of-income insurance” means insurance issued to provide indemnity for payments becoming due on a specific loan or other credit transaction while the debtor is involuntarily unemployed, as defined in the policy.

(b) An industrial loan company may provide and
 collect the costs for credit life insurance on the life of one or more of the borrowers, or credit disability, or loss-of-income insurance, or any combination of these coverages, to provide indemnity for payments becoming due on the indebtedness, with his or her consent, the form to be approved by the Insurance Commissioner, and a copy, together with evidence of its approval by the Insurance Commissioner, to be filed with the commissioner, and in an amount not in excess of the amount of the indebtedness. The amount charged to the borrower for credit life or disability insurance shall not exceed, in the case of credit life insurance, fifty cents ($0.50) per year per one hundred dollars ($100) of indebtedness (and in the same proportion for longer or shorter maturities and larger or smaller amounts) or the amount established by or pursuant to Section 779.35 of the Insurance Code, whichever is less, or, in the case of credit disability insurance, the amount established by or pursuant to Section 779.35 of the
 Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1314, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18291.

(a) If credit life or disability insurance is provided pursuant to this division, and if the insured borrower dies or becomes disabled during the term of the loan contract, the insurance shall be sufficient to pay the total amount due on the loan (excluding unearned charges) outstanding on the date of death, or all amounts which become due on the loan thereafter during the period of disability, as the case may be, without any exception, reservation, or limitation, subject, however, to the provisions of Section 18292.

(b) Any credit life, disability, or loss-of-income
 insurance as provided shall be in force as soon as the loan is made. An industrial loan company shall not require any of these coverages as a condition of making a loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 813, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18292.

(a) If credit disability insurance is provided pursuant to this division, it shall not provide indemnity against the risk of a borrower becoming disabled for a period of less than 14 days. The insurance may provide indemnity for any single period of continuous disability of 14 days or longer, after which the risk may become compensable. The insurance may be offered with retroactive coverage to an earlier date based upon the disability having continued for a period stated in the policy, but if insurance with retroactive coverage is offered, it shall also be offered without retroactive coverage, and the premium rate for each coverage
 shall be separately stated in writing to the borrower.

(b) If insurance with retroactive coverage is provided, the coverage shall provide for a prorated payment based upon the fraction of the month during which the insured is disabled, provided that the insured is continuously disabled during the waiting period set forth in the policy. If insurance without retroactive coverage is provided, the coverage shall provide for a prorated payment based upon the fraction of the month during which the insured is disabled, after first excluding the elimination period set forth in the policy. For the purpose of this subdivision, a month is any period of 30 consecutive days.

(c) Credit disability insurance, if made available by an industrial loan company, shall be available on a monthly or annual premium basis, and the premium by the month shall not exceed a pro rata relationship to the annual
 premium. Credit disability insurance need not be offered for a period less than the term of the loan to which it is applicable and no credit disability insurance shall be written for a period in excess of the term of the loan to which it is applicable.

(d) The monthly disability benefit payable with respect to an open end loan shall not exceed the monthly payment computed pursuant to Section 18300 on the outstanding balance at the time the disability is incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 199, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

18292.5.

If credit loss-of-income insurance is provided pursuant to this division, it shall be subject to the following conditions:

(a) The insurance shall provide indemnity in accordance with the terms of the policy after any single period of continuous unemployment of 45 days or less as determined by the policy, after which benefits shall commence. The insurance may be offered with retroactive coverage to an earlier date based upon unemployment having continued for the period stated in the policy.

(b) The statement required by
 Section 18293 shall include disclosure of the term of the coverage, the conditions of coverage, the benefits to be paid, and the exclusions from coverage.

(c) The borrower shall sign a certificate of voluntary acceptance of any credit loss-of-income insurance purchased. The certificate shall state in boldface type which is larger than the type used in the loan contract that purchase of the insurance is not a necessary condition to receiving the loan and that the insurance may be canceled by the borrower at any time within 15 days after it goes into force, in which event a full refund shall be made of the premium paid.

(d) The minimum benefit shall be payment up to the agreed amount on not less than four benefit payments, as stated in the policy, which accrue during a covered period of unemployment, except that during the first 60 days after inception of the policy, the minimum
 benefit may be payment up to the agreed amount of one-half the number of benefit payments, as stated in the policy, which accrue during a covered period of unemployment. The maximum benefits shall be established in the contract of insurance.

(e) If combination credit disability and loss-of-income coverage is offered, credit disability and credit loss-of-income coverages shall also be offered separately.

(f) Benefits may not be denied because the insured cannot establish a valid claim for unemployment compensation benefits under Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code solely because the former employer was not required to contribute to the State Unemployment Fund.

(g) If insurance with retroactive coverage is provided, the coverage shall provide for a prorated payment
 based upon the fraction of the month during which the insured is unemployed, provided that the insured is continuously unemployed during the waiting period set forth in the policy. If insurance without retroactive coverage is provided, the coverage shall provide for a prorated payment based upon the fraction of the month during which the insured is unemployed, after first excluding the elimination period set forth in the policy. For the purpose of this subdivision, a month is any period of 30 consecutive days.

(h) When unemployment continues for a number of months equal to or greater than the maximum number of benefit payments stated in the policy, the final payment shall be equal to the difference between a benefit payment and the initial prorated payment.

(i) As used in this section, “benefit payment” means payment of an amount equal to a loan repayment installment or a maximum
 amount established in the contract of insurance, whichever is less.

(j) The minimum benefit payment offered may not be less than the amount of a loan repayment installment unless the borrower or borrowers have two or more sources of income. If the maximum benefit payment offered is less than the amount of a loan repayment installment, the borrower shall also be offered coverage in which the maximum benefit payment is equal to the amount of a loan repayment installment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1314, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18293.

If credit disability or loss-of-income insurance is provided pursuant to this division, the industrial loan company shall also deliver an understandable written statement to the borrower detailing the conditions when the borrower will be entitled to make a claim under the insurance policy and the procedure to be followed in making the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18294.

An industrial loan company may collect the costs for insurance of tangible personal or real property offered as security for a loan, reasonably insured against loss for a reasonable term considering the circumstances of the loan, when the policy of insurance is made payable to the borrower or any member of his family, even though the customary mortgagee clause is attached, and if the insurance is sold at standard rates through duly licensed insurance agents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18295.

An industrial loan company may collect the costs of title insurance for loans secured primarily by real property. The costs for such insurance may be collected if:

(1) The principal amount of the loan is at least one thousand dollars ($1,000);

(2) The loan is secured by a lien of a deed of trust or mortgage on real property which is the subject of such policy of title insurance;

(3) The policy of title insurance is made payable to the lender or jointly to such
 lender and the borrower as their interests may appear;

(4) The coverage of such insurance may not exceed the lesser of the principal amount of the loan or the fair market value of the real property less prior encumbrances;

(5) The insurance is placed at standard rates through a title insurance company authorized to do business in the State of California;

(6) In connection with the renewal or extension of a loan, the additional cash advance is at least one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Such costs as herein authorized are not included in the maximum charges which may be made under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 858, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

18296.

An industrial loan company may collect the costs of insurance of the type defined by subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02 of the Insurance Code. Costs authorized by this section are not included in the maximum charges which may be made under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 199, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Open-End Loans [18300. - 18303.]

18300.

(a) As used in this article, “open-end loan” means a loan or loans made by an industrial loan company pursuant to a loan agreement which expressly states that it is made pursuant to this section and pursuant to which:

(1) The industrial loan company may permit the borrower to obtain advances of money from the industrial loan company from time to time or the industrial loan company may advance money on behalf of the borrower from time to time as directed by the borrower.

(2) The amount of each advance and
 the charges and other permitted costs are debited to an account.

(3) The charges are computed from time to time on the unpaid balances of the borrower’s account, excluding from the computation any unpaid charges other than permitted fees, costs and expenses.

(4) The borrower has the privilege of paying the account in full at any time or in monthly installments.

(b) Subject to the written approval of the commissioner of the industrial loan company’s plan of business for making open-end loans as not being misleading or deceptive and subject to regulations the commissioner may promulgate with respect to open-end loans under Section 18347, an industrial loan company may make open-end loans pursuant to this section and may contract for and receive thereon charges as set forth in Section 18212. Such charges may be
 calculated on an amount not exceeding the greater of:

(1) The actual daily unpaid balances of the open-end account in the billing cycle for which the charge is made, in which case one-thirtieth of the monthly rate may be charged for each day the unpaid balance is outstanding.

(2) The average daily unpaid balance of the open-end account in the billing cycle for which the charge is made, which is the sum of the amount unpaid each day during that cycle divided by the number of days in that cycle. The amount unpaid on a day is determined by adding to the balance unpaid as of the beginning of that day all advances and other debits and deducting all payments and other credits made or received as of that day.

The billing cycle shall be monthly. A billing cycle is monthly if the closing date of that cycle is the same date each month or does not
 vary by more than four days from the regular date.

(c) No industrial loan company shall enter into any agreement for an open-end loan that provides for a minimum payment that would result in the full repayment of principal over more than the maximum periods set forth below opposite the respective size of loans.Principal amount of loanMaximum periodLess than $1,500 24 months and 15 days$1,500 but less than $2,500 36 months
 and 15 days$2,500 but less than $4,000 48 months and 15 days$4,000 but less than $6,000 60 months and 15 days$6,000 but less than $10,000 84 months and 15 daysThe minimum payment shall be determined by the amount of the initial loan advance and shall continue at that amount until a subsequent loan advance is made, at which time the minimum payment shall be determined by the amount of the unpaid balance of the loan after the advance and including the advance. Minimum payments after each advance shall be determined in the
 same manner.

(d) On open-end loans the industrial loan company may contract for and receive the fees, costs and expenses permitted on other loans, including those permitted by Sections 18215, 18218, 18290, 18294, and 18412, subject to all of the conditions and restrictions set forth in those sections with the following variations:

(1) The charge for credit life insurance shall be on a monthly basis. No credit life insurance written in connection with an open-end loan shall be cancelled by the lender because of delinquency of the borrower in the making of the minimum payments thereon unless one or more of such payments is past due for a period of 90 days or more, and the lender shall advance to the insurer the amounts required to keep the insurance in force during such period, which amounts may be debited to the borrower’s account.

(e) An industrial loan company shall not make an open-end loan in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) principal amount.

(f) The loan contract shall provide for payment of minimum payments complying with subdivision (c). All loans made pursuant to this section shall be repayable by equal or substantially equal monthly payments during the term of the loan.

(g) In lieu of applying the provisions of Section 18290, the provisions contained herein shall apply to open-end loans.

An industrial loan company may provide insurance on the life of one or more borrowers with the borrower’s consent. The form of the insurance shall be approved by the Insurance Commissioner and shall be in an amount not in excess of the indebtedness. The amount charged to the borrower for such insurance shall
 not exceed the amount provided in paragraph (1) or (2) following, whichever is less:

(1) The premium rate filed with the Insurance Commissioner for the coverage provided pursuant to Article 5.9 (commencing with Section 779.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code and which has not been disapproved by the Insurance Commissioner.

(2) Fifty cents ($0.50) per year per one hundred dollars ($100) of indebtedness (and in the same proportion for longer or shorter maturities and larger or smaller amounts) or such different maximum as is fixed by the Insurance Commissioner by a valid and effective regulation hereafter adopted.

Notwithstanding Section 18291, any such life insurance shall be in force as soon as the loan is made or coverage is agreed upon, whichever is later.

(h) The open-end loan agreement shall contain the name and address of the industrial loan company and shall disclose the nature of the security taken, if any, the method of determining the minimum payments which will be required to repay the initial advance, and any subsequent advances on the loan, and the agreed rate of charge.

(i) At the time the open-end loan agreement is made the industrial loan company shall obtain from the borrower a signed statement as to whether any person has performed any act as a broker in connection with the making of the loan. If such statement discloses a broker or other person has participated, the company shall obtain a full statement of all sums paid or payable to the broker or other person. The open-end loan agreement and the statement required by this subdivision shall be kept for a period of two years after the date the loan has been paid in full, or has matured according to its terms, or has
 been charged off.

(j) Except in the case of an account which the industrial loan company deems to be uncollectible, or with respect to which delinquency collection procedures have been instituted, the company shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the borrower, or any one thereof, for each billing cycle at the end of which there is an outstanding balance in the account or with respect to which a finance charge is imposed, a statement setting forth the outstanding balance in the account at the beginning of the billing cycle, the date and amount of any subsequent loan advance during the period, the amounts and dates of crediting to the account during the billing cycle for payments, the amount of any finance charge debited to the account during the billing cycle, the annual percentage rate of finance charged determined under Regulation Z promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 C.F.R. 226), the balance on which
 the finance charge was computed, the closing date of the billing cycle, the outstanding balance on that date, and the minimum monthly payment required in the absence of any additional advance. If there has been any change in the nature of the security for the loan since the next preceding advance, the statement shall contain or be accompanied by a statement of the nature of the security for the loan after such change.

(k) An industrial loan company shall not take any instrument in connection with an open-end loan in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution.

(l) Subdivision (a) of Section 18205, and Sections 18206, 18214, 18222, 18231, and 18235 shall not apply to open-end loans.

(m) An industrial loan company shall not make an open-end loan secured by real property in whole or in part.

(n) An industrial loan company shall not charge for, offer or provide credit disability insurance in connection with an open-end loan.

(o) This section shall not apply to loans other than open-end loans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 297, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18301.

(a) Whenever authorized by the commissioner, an industrial loan company whose thrift obligations are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation may make a secured line of credit loan. Security for line of credit loans shall be of a kind and class that has been declared eligible by the commissioner. 

(b) Line of credit loans authorized under Title VIII (Alternative Mortgage Transaction Party Act of 1982) of the Garn-St. Germain Depository Institutions Act of 1982 are not subject to subdivision (a).

(c) As used in this article, “line of credit loan” means a loan whereby a borrower requests and a company disburses loan proceeds in an installment or installments during the term of the loan by an advance or series of advances, whether or not the timing of the advance or advances is known on the date the loan is approved by the company.

(d) This section does not apply to secured line of credit lending activities engaged in on or before May 1, 1989, unless, after that date there is a change in the secured line of credit plan of business by the company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 889, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

18302.

An industrial loan company shall file a written request for authorization to conduct business under subdivision (a) of Section 18301. The request shall include all of the following information:

(a) A description of the company’s proposed plan of business.

(b) The character, business qualifications, and other experience of the proposed officers and managers directing the line of business for which authorization is requested.

(c) Any other facts and circumstances
 bearing on the proposal that, in the opinion of the commissioner, may be relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 889, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

18303.

The commissioner shall approve the request made pursuant to Section 18302 within 30 days after filing unless the commissioner has ascertained that the company has failed to show either of the following:

(a) That the proposed plan of business has a reasonable promise of a successful operation.

(b) That the company has a person with the necessary business qualifications, experience, or ability to direct and manage the operations of the plan of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 889, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Investment Certificates [18315. - 18325.]

18315.

(a) When authorized to conduct business pursuant to this division, an industrial loan company may sell and issue its investment certificates subject to the provisions of this division. The commissioner may, by written order directed to a company or by rule or regulation, impose terms and conditions upon investment certificates and the sale or redemption thereof or the payment of interest thereon, as he or she deems reasonable and necessary or advisable for the protection of the company or the public, and he or she may from time to time in
 his or her discretion amend, alter or revoke any such order or regulation or any condition or provision thereof.

(b) Any change in the form, terms, or provisions of outstanding investment certificates or in the rights, privileges, or restrictions upon the holder or issuer thereof is deemed a sale and issuance of investment certificates.

(c) The company named in any order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section may, within 15 days after receipt thereof, file with the commissioner its written request for hearing. The filing of the request shall not operate to postpone or suspend the effectiveness of any order issued by the commissioner unless otherwise directed by the commissioner. The commissioner shall, within 15 days after the receipt of the written request or at such later time as may be mutually agreed with the company, cause the matter to be heard and shall
 thereafter issue his final decision. The decision may be amended or set aside by the commissioner at any time.

(d) Every order or decision of the commissioner made pursuant to this section is subject to judicial review in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 827, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18316.

An industrial loan company may, in addition to the sale of installment investment certificates with loans, sell or negotiate investment certificates either in certificates, or in receipt book form. The certificates may provide for the payment of money at any time, either fixed or uncertain. The company may receive payments therefor in installments or otherwise, with or without an allowance of interest upon such installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18317.

No company may have investment certificates outstanding with a person or related persons in an aggregate amount in excess of 20 percent of the unimpaired capital stock and surplus of the company not available for dividends as provided in Section 18319.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 663, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 20 of Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

18318.

Investment or thrift certificates may be issued to or in the name of a minor and as such shall be for the exclusive right and benefit of such minor and may be redeemed in whole or part by said minor or his order and payment so made is a valid release and discharge to the company for such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18318.5.

An investment or thrift certificate that is a multiple-party account as defined in Section 5132 of the Probate Code is governed by Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

18319.

In no event shall an industrial loan company have outstanding at any time its investment certificates (exclusive of those hypothecated with the company issuing them) in an aggregate sum in excess of 20 times the aggregate amount of its paid-up and unimpaired capital and such of its unimpaired surplus as is declared by a bylaw of the company to be not available for cash dividends. The commissioner by rule or by order issued pursuant to Section 18315, may limit the amount of outstanding investment certificates of an industrial loan company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 858, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

18320.

Notwithstanding Section 18319, an industrial loan company shall in no event:

(a) Have outstanding at any time during its first 12 months of operation as an industrial loan company under this division, its investment certificates (exclusive of those hypothecated with the company issuing them) in an aggregate sum in excess of six times the aggregate amount of its paid-up and unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus not available for dividends pursuant to Section 18319.

(b) After 12 months of operation as an industrial loan
 company under this division and during the next 12 months of operation the industrial loan company may file an application with the commissioner seeking authority to increase the aggregate sum of its investment certificates which (exclusive of those investment certificates hypothecated with the company issuing them) in no event shall exceed eight times the aggregate amount of its paid-up and unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus not available for dividends pursuant to Section 18319.

(c) After 24 months of operation as an industrial loan company under this division and during the next 24 months of operation the company may file an application with the commissioner seeking authority to increase the aggregate sum of its investment certificates which (exclusive of those investment certificates hypothecated with the company issuing them) in no event shall exceed 12 times the aggregate amount of its paid-up and unimpaired capital and unimpaired
 surplus not available for dividends pursuant to Section 18319.

(d) If after 36 months of operation as an industrial loan company under this division the outstanding investment certificates of a company are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the company may file an application with the commissioner seeking authority to increase the aggregate sum of its investment certificates which it may have outstanding to the extent authorized by the capital-adequacy requirements of the federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. An industrial loan company that is authorized to increase the aggregate sum of its investment certificates to the extent authorized by the capital-adequacy requirements of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation also shall meet the requirements of subdivisions (e) and (f).

(e) After 48 months of operation as an industrial loan company under this division
 and during the next 12 months of operation the company may file an application with the commissioner seeking authority to increase the aggregate sum of its investment certificates which, exclusive of those investment certificates hypothecated with the company issuing them, in no event shall exceed 15 times the aggregate amount of its paid-up and unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus not available for dividends pursuant to Section 18319, only if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) A company shall maintain a liquidity reserve in cash, or cash equivalent, equal to 112 percent of its total investment certificates outstanding. “Cash equivalent” means investments legal for commercial banks under the laws of this state, with a maturity of not more than 12 months.

(2) In
 addition to the reserve for losses required by the commissioner pursuant to Section 18343, a company shall establish and maintain such special reserves for losses as the commissioner, by rule or order, may require.

(f) After 60 months of operation as an industrial loan company under this division, the company may file an application with the commissioner seeking authority to increase the aggregate sum of its investment certificates which it may have outstanding, which, exclusive of those investment certificates hypothecated with the company issuing them, in no event shall exceed 20 times the aggregate amount of its paid-up and unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus not available for dividends pursuant to Section 18319, and which may exceed 15 times the amount of its paid-up and unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus not available for dividends pursuant to Section 18319 only if the requirements of subdivision (e) are met and the capital
 stock is not less than one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000) and the unimpaired paid-in surplus is not less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000).
